Hawaii statutes.
[§269-8.5] Annual financial reports.
All annual financial reports required to be filed with the commission by public
utilities shall include a certification that such report conforms with the
applicable uniform system of accounts adopted by the commission. [L 1977, c 15,
§1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next